Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10-226.5] Notice of cancellation or
nonrenewal. In the case of cancellation of a policy, the insurer shall
give written notice to the insured not fewer than ten days prior to the
effective date of cancellation. For nonrenewal of a policy, the insurer shall
give written notice to the insured not fewer than thirty days prior to the
effective date of nonrenewal. If under title 24 or a policy, a longer time
period is required for a notice of cancellation or nonrenewal for the policy,
the longer period shall be applicable. Cancellation or nonrenewal shall not be
deemed valid unless evidence of mailing is provided. [L 2000, c 182, §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next